Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
Subchapter 5
— Benefits Generally

Preambles.

Acts 1943, No. 174 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, The Arkansas Employment Security Act as now written contains no provisions applying to seasonal industries; and

“Whereas, There exists in this State a number of industries whose business is seasonal having a regular recurring period of decreased activity or inactivity in each calendar year; and

“Whereas, Employees in such industries know that employment therein will cease at the end of the seasonal period; and

“Whereas, The purpose of the act is to reduce the hazards of unemployment to workers only during periods when they normally are employed and expect to be employed; and

“Whereas, Said seasonal employees under the present act nevertheless obtain compensation during periods when they normally do not work or expect to work in such seasonal employment; and

“Whereas, The payment of such compensation is an unwarranted drain on the Unemployment Compensation Fund, to the prejudice of all other insured workers, and also tends to increase contribution rates of all employees….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1943, No. 174, § 5: Mar. 6, 1943. Emergency clause provided: “The fund being unduly depleted by virtue of payments to seasonal employees, thereby prejudicing the security of future payments to regular insured employees, and this act being necessary for the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1953, No. 162, § 22: July 1, 1953.

Acts 1955, No. 395, § 30: July 1, 1955.

Acts 1959, No. 13, § 4: July 1, 1959.

Acts 1959, No. 99,
§ 2: July 1, 1959.

Acts 1963, No. 93, § 13: July 1, 1963.

Acts 1967, No. 248, § 2: July 1, 1967.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 25: approved Feb. 3, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an unemployment crisis exists in this State and in order to give better protection to the unemployed and their families extended benefits of the unemployment insurance program should be made available and to alleviate as much as possible the suffering and distress caused by unemployment, it is necessary to work in cooperation with the federal government; and in order to receive the benefits of federal law and comply with the mandate of the United States Congress as provided in United States Public Law 91-373, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1972 (Ex. Sess.), No. 58, § 3: approved Mar. 6, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “In order to secure promptly the payment of benefits to those entitled, after giving both the employer and the claimant an opportunity to be heard as required by the United States Supreme Court in the case of California Department of Human Resources Development, et al. vs. Judity Java, et al.; 91 S. Ct. 1347 (1971), it is determined by the Legislature that this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety an emergency should be and is hereby declared to exist; and this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1972 (Ex. Sess.), No. 65, § 3: Mar. 6, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “The passage of this Act being necessary to protect the rights of members or ex-members of the Armed Forces of the United States and prevent unwarranted hardship in obtaining benefits under the Employment Security Laws of Arkansas. It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly meeting in Extraordinary Session that an emergency exists and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 329, § 14: Mar. 14, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Employment Security laws of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the working and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 154, § 2: Feb. 12, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under present law, veterans of the armed forces receiving education allowances provided by Chapter 31 or Chapter 34 of Title 38 United States Code Annotated are not eligible to receive benefits under the Arkansas Employment Act and that such ineligibility works an undue hardship upon the veterans of this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 609, § 19: Mar. 28, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the working and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 627, § 3: Mar. 28, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present law relating to unemployment compensation, persons who are retired involuntarily and are receiving retirement benefits under the Social Security Act or under a State-supported retirement system are not eligible to receive unemployment compensation when they are involuntarily retired; that this creates a severe hardship on such persons and denies to them unemployment compensation at a time when they probably need it most; that it is in the best interest of the citizens of this State that provision be made for permitting such persons to receive unemployment compensation at the earliest possible date and that this Act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1083, § 14: Jan. 30, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State of Arkansas are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the citizens of this State when they experience a period of unemployment and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 366, § 14: Mar. 17, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the employed and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 376, § 21: approved Mar. 8, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to receive the benefits of Federal law and to comply with the mandate of the United States Congress as provided in United States Public Law 94-566 and in order to give better protection to the unemployed workers and their families, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1977, No. 589, § 3: Mar. 22, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-First General Assembly that the Employment Security Act is in need of amendment in order to clarify the basis for determination of eligibility to receive unemployment insurance benefits, and that to accomplish the purpose and intent of this Act, it is essential that this Act be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 925, § 6: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of the Act on July 1, 1977 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1977 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1977 (Ex. Sess.), No. 25, § 4: Aug. 15, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to exempt coverage of local school districts from unemployment insurance coverage should the United States Supreme Court declare such coverage unconstitutional, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 252, § 5: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the expeditious disposition of claims under the Workers' Compensation Law and of judicial review of adjudications made by agencies subject to the Administrative Procedure Act are of great interest and concern to the State of Arkansas and the parties involved in such proceedings; and that the present system of judicial review has not been adequate to insure the prompt and final determination of the issues involved in such matters and, as a result, there has been undue delay to the prejudice of the State and the parties involved. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1979, No. 492, § 18: Mar. 21, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to clarify certain provisions of the Employment Security Law that may be subject to misinterpretation and in order to bring the said Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 94-566, P.L. 95-19, and P.L. 95-216 so that Arkansas employers and workers may receive the benefits of the said Federal Unemployment Tax Act, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 922, § 18: Apr. 16, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to clarify certain provisions of the Employment Security Law that may be subject to misinterpretation and in order to bring the said Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 94-566, P.L. 95-19, and P.L. 95-216 so that Arkansas employers and workers may receive the benefits of the said Federal Unemployment Tax Act, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 43, § 22: Feb. 10, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to restore and insure solvency to the State's unemployment insurance trust fund from which unemployment benefits are paid to unemployed Arkansas workers and in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 96-364 and P.L. 96-499 and with P.L. 95-524, 96-249 and 96-265 so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981 (Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 11: Dec. 2, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the amendments to the Federal Unemployment Tax Act contained in Public Law 97-35 and to comply with other provisions of Federal law mandated by Public Law 97-35 so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and so that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when unemployed and qualified to receive such benefits, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 482, § 41: Mar. 16, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to conform with P.L. 97-300 and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 97-248 and to insure the future solvency of the unemployment insurance fund so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, Nos. 8, 9, § 34: Jan. 30, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended by P.L. 98-21 and P.L. 98-369, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 672, § 13: Apr. 7, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1083 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby delared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 753, § 30: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections to the Shared Work plan provisions which enable employers to avoid layoffs and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989, No. 420, § 17: Mar. 8, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections, and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediately preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 48, § 13: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 100, § 58: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year; that the next fiscal year begins on July 1, 1991 and this act may not go into effect until after July 1, 1991 unless an emergency is declared. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 6, § 21: Feb. 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 519, § 14: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 234, § 32: Feb. 21, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1360, § 132: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, Section 115 shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of passage and approval and the remainder of the Act shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 1116, § 19: April 5, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1537, § 140: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1999 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1999 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 1367, § 11: Apr. 5, 2001 and No. 1467, § 7, Apr. 10, 2001. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 353, § 3: Mar. 13, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1223, § 15: Apr. 10, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Department into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 902, § 15: Mar. 16, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Department into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive tax credits under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits whenever they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 490, § 18: Mar. 26, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to make needed technical changes; to enable the state to capture and utilize penalty and interest owing from claimants; and in order that the state might continue to be in compliance with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 802, § 14: Apr. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to assure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment benefits and the continued provision of benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 1040, § 5: Apr. 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that eligible persons might lose unemployment benefits or have benefits delayed without this act; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment benefits and the continued provision of unemployment benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 956, § 10: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Workforce Services must ensure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment insurance benefits; that the state's unemployment insurance program must remain in conformity with federal law requirements; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay would interfere with continued provision of benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2015, No. 690, § 8: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Workforce Services must ensure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment insurance benefits; that the state's unemployment insurance program must remain in conformity with federal law requirements; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay would interfere with continued provision of benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2019, No. 453, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-10-501. Payment.

All benefits provided in this chapter shall be payable from the Unemployment Compensation Fund.

All benefits shall be paid through Division of Workforce Services offices, in accordance with such rules as the Director of the Division of Workforce Services may prescribe.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 3; 1971, No. 35, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 25; 2019, No. 315, § 819; 2019, No. 910, §
232.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (b), substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” and “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services”.